Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1418
Commission; members; terms; vacancy.

(1) The members of the commission appointed by the Governor, except for the members of the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council, shall serve for terms of six years each. Of the members first appointed, four shall serve for terms of two years, four shall serve for terms of four years, and five shall serve for terms of six years from January 1 next succeeding their appointments. A member may be reappointed at the expiration of his or her term. Any vacancy occurring otherwise than by expiration of a term shall be filled, for the balance of the unexpired term, in the same manner as the original appointment.

(2) No member shall serve beyond the time when he or she holds the office, employment, or status by reason of which he or she was initially eligible for appointment. Any member of the commission appointed by the Governor may be removed from the commission for cause upon notice and an opportunity to be heard at a public hearing. One of the causes for removal shall be absence from three regularly scheduled meetings of the commission during any six-month period when the member has failed to advise the commission in advance of such meeting that he or she will be absent and stating a reason therefor.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 4, p. 2933;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 12.